Idaho, session 2026, H0889.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9203. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Acquisition" means the process of procuring property.
(2) "Administrator" means the administrator of the division of pur-
chasing as created by section 67-9204, Idaho Code.
(3) "Agency" means all officers, departments, divisions, bureaus,
boards, commissions and institutions of the state, including the public
utilities commission, but excluding:
(a) The legislative and judicial branches of government;
(b) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state con-
troller, state treasurer, attorney general and superintendent of pub-
lic instruction; and
(c) Except as provided in section 67-9234, Idaho Code, a state insti-
tution of higher education that complies with the provisions of section
67-9225, Idaho Code.
(4) "Best and final offer" means a final written offer submitted by a
bidder in response to a request by the administrator during negotiations or
following material changes to a solicitation.
(4) (5) "Bid" means a written offer to perform a contract to sell or oth-
erwise supply property in response to a solicitation.


(5) (6) "Bidder" means a vendor who has submitted a bid on property to be
acquired by the state.
(6) (7) "Contract" means an agreement for the acquisition of property,
including a purchase order.
(7) (8) "Contractor" means a vendor who has been awarded a contract.
(8) (9) "Director" means the director of the department of administra-
tion as created by section 67-5701, Idaho Code.
(9) (10) "Environmental, social, and governance standards" means pro-
curement standards that screen or score bids, in whole or in part, on subjec-
tive ethical or sustainability criteria unrelated to the specifications in a
solicitation or the qualifications of a bidder.
(11) "Frivolous protest" means a challenge to a solicitation or con-
tract award that:
(a) Lacks any arguable basis in law or fact;
(b) Is not supported by a good faith argument for the extension, modifi-
cation, or reversal of an existing contract award;
(c) Is filed for an improper purpose, such as to harass, cause unneces-
sary delay, or needlessly increase the cost of the procurement process;
or
(d) Asserts claims that are identical or substantially similar to
claims previously adjudicated by the administrator or a court of com-
petent jurisdiction, including proceedings in Idaho and other states,
involving the same vendor and a similar procurement.
(10) (12) "Lowest responsible bidder" means the responsible bidder
whose bid reflects the lowest acquisition price to be paid by the state and
meets the bid qualifications, except that when specifications are valued or
comparative performance evaluations are conducted, the results of such ex-
aminations and the relative score of valued specifications will be weighed,
as set out in the specifications, in determining the lowest acquisition
price.
(13) "Multiple-award contract" means a contract awarded to two (2) or
more bidders to furnish the same or similar property when necessary or conve-
nient to ensure adequate delivery, service, or product compatibility.
(11) (14) "Open contract" means a contract awarded by the state through
the division of purchasing as a result of a competitive solicitation to one
(1) or more vendors who have agreed to allow all agencies to procure speci-
fied property under the terms and conditions set forth in the contract.
(12) (15) "Procure" means to obtain property for state use in a manner
other than by gift, including, but not limited to, purchase, lease, or rent.
(13) (16) "Property" means goods, services, parts, supplies, and equip-
ment, both tangible and intangible, including, but not limited to, designs,
plans, programs, systems, techniques, and any rights or interests in such
property.
(17) "Request for information" means a formal request to potential ven-
dors to provide information on their capabilities, services, and pricing for
the purpose of identifying the scope of requested work, which may include
eventual procurement of property, in order to create a draft request for pro-
posals.


(18) "Request for proposal" means a formal request for vendors to sub-
mit a bid, which includes the total scope of services and is the basis of the
award of a contract.
(19) "Request for quote" means an informal request to vendors for pric-
ing and terms on specific property.
(14) (20) "Sole source" means the only vendor from whom specific prop-
erty is available to procure.
(15) (21) "Solicitation" means an invitation to bid, a request for pro-
posal, or a request for quote issued pursuant to this chapter for the purpose
of procuring property.
(16) (22) "Specifications" means the standards or requirements for
property to be procured as explicitly stated in a solicitation or contract.
(17) (23) "State institution of higher education" means Boise state
university, Idaho state university, or Lewis-Clark state college.
(18) (24) "Vendor" means a person or entity capable of supplying prop-
erty to the state.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-9205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9205. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE ADMINISTRATOR. The administrator of
the division of purchasing:
(1) Shall acquire all property for state agencies according to the pro-
visions of this chapter;
(2) Shall acquire all property by competitive solicitation, except as
otherwise provided;
(3) Shall determine, based on the specifications and matters relating
to responsibility, the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in all competi-
tive solicitations;
(4) Shall enter into contracts and any modifications thereto for the
acquisition of property on behalf of and in the name of state agencies;
(5) Shall, when economically feasible and practical, consolidate so-
licitations and acquire property in amounts as large as can be efficiently
managed and controlled;
(6) Shall establish a common time and date for the submission of best
and final offers. If a bidder does not submit a notice of withdrawal or a best
and final offer, the bidder's immediate previous offer shall be the bidder's
best and final offer;
(6) (7) May, in the evaluation of paper product bids, give those items
that meet the recycled content standards as specified by the administrator
a five percent (5%) purchasing preference. As such, those qualifying paper
products may be considered to cost five percent (5%) less when choosing the
lowest responsible bidder;
(7) (8) May appoint a deputy who shall have the power to act for the
administrator and in the administrator's place while absent, which deputy
shall be bonded to the state of Idaho as prescribed by chapter 8, title 59,
Idaho Code;
(8) (9) May require from any contractor the submission of a performance
bond for such sum as will, in the opinion of the administrator, guarantee the
faithful performance of such contract, and the amount and requirement there-
for shall be set out in the specifications;


(9) (10) May enter into open contracts based on actual or estimated re-
quirements;
(10) (11) May enter into contracts, including leases and rentals, for
periods of time exceeding one (1) year, provided that such contracts contain
no penalty to or restriction upon on the state in the event cancellation is
necessitated by a lack of funding for any such contract;
(11) (12) Is authorized and empowered to formulate rules, subject to the
approval of the director, to effect the provisions of this chapter;
(12) (13) May enter into negotiations for acquisitions in accordance
with established rules of the division, provided that for all complex or
high-value acquisitions, the administrator shall ensure that subject matter
experts from the requisitioning agency are included as active participants
in the negotiation process alongside procurement staff to ensure contrac-
tual terms meet the functional and operational requirements of the state;
(13) (14) May inspect property supplied by a contractor to determine
whether it meets specifications;
(14) (15) May classify, after review with the various agencies, the
requirements of the state for all property that may be acquired, and may
adopt standards of quality for property, and may establish specifications
for acquisition. Each specification shall, until revised or rescinded,
apply alike in terms and effect to each future acquisition of the classified
property;
(15) (16) May delegate authority pursuant to section 67-9206, Idaho
Code; and
(16) (17) May carry out such acts as are necessary to enforce the provi-
sions of this chapter; and
(18) May issue a multiple-award contract to two (2) or more bidders.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-9208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9208. SOLICITATIONS. (1) The administrator shall not make or
cause to be made any acquisition until a requisition for the property to
be acquired has been submitted to the administrator's office by the req-
uisitioning agency. The requisition shall certify to the administrator's
satisfaction that there are sufficient funds or balance in appropriations
out of which the amount of the requisition may be lawfully paid, except as
provided in section 67-9221(3), Idaho Code.
(2) Upon determining that an agency's requisition complies with the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall issue
a solicitation. Notice of the solicitation shall be posted in a conspicuous
manner as prescribed by rule. The notice shall describe the property to be
acquired in sufficient detail to apprise a vendor of the exact nature of the
property being sought and shall set forth the bid closing date, time and
location.
(3) The administrator may establish by rule exceptions to the notice
provisions in subsection (2) of this section; provided however, that the
procurements excepted from the notice provisions must be minor in nature.
(4) At the time a notice of solicitation is issued, the administrator
shall also publish the process for bid analysis or scoring. Such process
shall not change after the solicitation is issued unless formally revised


through a written solicitation amendment or best and final offer process
that does not materially change the intent or purpose of the original solic-
itation.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-9210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9210. AWARD OF CONTRACT. (1) The administrator shall award con-
tracts to, and place orders for property with, the lowest responsible
bidder. Qualifications for responsibility shall be prescribed by rule.
However, environmental, social, and governance standards may not be used as
a qualification for responsibility. Prior performance on state contracts
may be used to determine qualifications.
(2) Where both the bids and quality of property offered are the same,
preference shall be given to property of local and domestic production and
manufacture or from bidders having a significant Idaho economic presence as
defined in section 67-2349, Idaho Code. In connection with the award of any
contract for the placement of any order for state printing, binding, engrav-
ing or stationery work, the provisions of sections 60-101 and 60-103, Idaho
Code, shall apply to the extent that the same may be inconsistent with any re-
quirements contained in this section.
(3) In awarding contracts, the administrator shall not discriminate
against, or grant preferential treatment to, any individual or group on the
basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity, or national origin unless permitted by
an exception described in section 67-5909A, Idaho Code.
(4) The administrator may award a contract to two (2) or more qualified
bidders to furnish the same or similar property when necessary or convenient
to ensure adequate delivery, service, or product compatibility.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-9211, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9211, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9211. MULTIPLE AWARDS. (1) When a contract for property has been
awarded to two (2) or more bidders in accordance with the provisions of sec-
tion 67-9210, Idaho Code, a state agency shall select which bidder to pur-
chase the property from based on factors including but not limited to:
(a) Total cost of ownership, including acquisition price, shipping or
delivery charges, and any applicable maintenance or licensing fees;
(b) The degree to which the property integrates with existing agency
equipment, software, or workflows without requiring excessive modifi-
cation or retraining;
(c) The vendor's compatibility, price, availability, support ser-
vices, delivery, and past performance;
(d) The vendor's ability to meet the agency's required delivery sched-
ule or project timeline;
(e) The vendor's quality and proximity of technical support, warranty
terms, and the availability of training or installation services;


(f) The vendor's documented history of reliability, quality of goods,
and responsiveness under the current contract or previous agency en-
gagements; and
(g) The vendor's willingness to cover costs and liabilities related to
the replacement of existing property.
(2) State agencies that make recurring purchases pursuant to a contract
awarded pursuant to this section shall perform the analysis outlined in sub-
section (1) of this section at least annually and provide the analysis to the
administrator.
(3) State agencies shall notify the administrator of purchases made un-
der a multiple-award contract that provides the names of the considered ven-
dors, the factors provided in subsection (1) of this section that were pri-
oritized for the purchase, and an explanation of why the selected vendor was
chosen over other vendors.
SECTION 7. That Section 67-9212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9212. CONTRACTS SHALL BE IN WRITING. (1) Every contract made by the
administrator on behalf of the state shall be in writing and shall be signed
manually or electronically by the contracting parties. Every contract shall
be filed in the office of the administrator, together with all bids, specifi-
cations, and other documents and records associated with the acquisition or
intended acquisition.
(2) For acquisitions involving federal funding requiring approval by
the centers for medicare and medicaid services or other federal oversight
agencies, the administrator shall ensure that all vendor negotiations are
completed and a final contract is agreed on prior to the submission of the
contract for federal review, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law.
SECTION 8. That Section 67-9215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9215. PRESERVATION AND DISCLOSURE OF RECORDS -- EXCEPTION. (1) The
administrator shall preserve all records relating to solicitations in the
administrator's office, and information with respect thereto, in such form
as the administrator shall prescribe by rule, for a period of three (3) years
after the date of final action, or for a period of time as may be prescribed
by a record retention guideline schedule approved by the director. Records
preserved under the provisions of this section shall be subject to disclo-
sure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(2) If a solicitation is canceled prior to award of a contract, the
administrator shall immediately return all bids to the submitting vendors
or delete bids that were received electronically. Bids returned or deleted
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to disclosure under chapter
1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(3) Vendor information provided in a request for information shall not
be subject to disclosure unless the vendors respond to the relevant solici-
tation as provided in section 67-9208, Idaho Code.


SECTION 9. That Section 67-9217, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9217. DEBARMENT AND DISQUALIFICATION OF VENDORS. (1) A debarred or
disqualified vendor may not submit a bid.
(2) The administrator may debar a vendor from bidding on any state
project or service for a period of up to three (3) years upon a finding of per-
formance failure. Performance failure shall include but not be limited to:
(a) A documented record of unsatisfactory performance on one (1) or
more state contracts within the preceding three (3) years based on in-
cluded contract metrics;
(b) Failure to complete a project or service within the time frames es-
tablished in the contract without good cause; or
(c) A history of filing three (3) or more frivolous bid protests, as es-
tablished by final agency decisions issued pursuant to section 67-9232,
Idaho Code, within a twenty-four (24) month period.
(2) (3) A vendor may be disqualified by the administrator for any of the
following reasons:
(a) Failure to perform according to the terms of any contract;
(b) Attempts by whatever means to cause specifications to be drawn so as
to favor a specific vendor;
(c) Use of the provisions of this chapter to obstruct or unreasonably
delay acquisitions by the state;
(d) Perjury in a vendor disqualification hearing;
(e) Knowingly violate violating the provisions of this chapter; or
(f) Debarment, suspension, or ineligibility from federal contracting
of the vendor, its principals or its affiliates.
(4)(a) Upon determination of a performance failure or contract breach
that does not represent an immediate risk to public health, safety, or
integrity, the administrator shall issue a written cure notice to the
vendor of the exact nature of the failure and the violated contract pro-
visions.
(b) The vendor shall have fourteen (14) calendar days from receipt of
the cure notice to correct the deficiency or provide a correction plan
acceptable to the administrator.
(c) If the vendor fails to correct the deficiency or provide a correc-
tion plan accepted by the administrator within fourteen (14) calendar
days, the administrator may proceed with debarment or disqualification
of the vendor.
(d) If the vendor fails to complete the approved correction plan, the
administrator may proceed with debarment or disqualification.
(3) (5) A vendor shall be notified by registered mail within ten (10)
days of the vendor's debarment or disqualification by the administrator.
The vendor may, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of such notice, re-
quest a hearing, which shall be held in accordance with chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code.
(6) The vendor may submit a challenge to the debarment or disqualifica-
tion based on documented state actions that interfered with or delayed con-
tract execution.


(4) (7) In lieu of debarment or disqualification, for reasons not
listed in subsection (3) of this section, the determinations officer at a
hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section the provisions
of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, may recommend to the director specific
conditions to the vendor's continued participation in acquisitions by the
state.
(5) (8) Disqualification or conditions may be imposed for a period of
not less than six (6) months or not more than five (5) years.
(6) (9) For purposes of this section, "obstruction" means a lack of suc-
cess in more than fifty percent (50%) of the specification challenges made in
each of three (3) different acquisitions during any twenty-four (24) month
period.
SECTION 10. That Section 67-9230, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9230. PROHIBITIONS. (1) No contract or any interest therein shall
be transferred by the contractor to whom such contract is given to any other
party without approval in writing by the administrator and by the board of
examiners pursuant to section 67-1027, Idaho Code. Transfer of a contract
without approval shall cause the annulment of the contract so transferred,
at the option of the state. All rights of action, however, for any breach of
such contract by the contracting parties are reserved to the state.
(2) No member of the legislature or any officer or employee of any
branch of the state government shall directly, himself, or by any other per-
son in trust for him or for his use or benefit or on his account, undertake,
execute, hold or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract made or entered into
by or on behalf of the state of Idaho, if made by, through, or on behalf of the
department in which he is an officer or employee; or if made by, through or
on behalf of any other department unless the same is made after competitive
bids.
(3) Except as provided in this chapter, no officer or employee shall in-
fluence or attempt to influence the award of a contract to a particular ven-
dor, or to deprive or attempt to deprive any vendor of a contract.
(4) No officer or employee shall conspire with a vendor or its agent,
and no vendor or its agent shall conspire with an officer or employee, to in-
fluence or attempt to influence the award of a contract, or to deprive or at-
tempt to deprive a vendor of a contract.
(5) No officer or employee shall fail to use an open contract except as
provided in this chapter.
(6) No officer or employee shall accept property knowing that the prop-
erty does not meet specifications or other acceptance criteria set forth in
the contract.
(7) Deprivation, influence or attempts thereat shall not include writ-
ten reports, based upon on substantial evidence, sent to the administrator
concerning matters relating to the responsibility of vendors.
(8)(a) No vendor or related party, or subsidiary, or affiliate of a ven-
dor, may submit a bid to obtain a contract to provide property to the
state, if the vendor or related party, or affiliate, or subsidiary was
paid for services used in preparing the specifications or if the ser-


vices influenced the procurement process to prepare the specifications
for the property.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a vendor from submitting
a bid after providing technical assistance relating to such bid, pro-
viding consulting or other services to a state agency, or participating
in legislative committee meetings related to the property that is the
subject of planned solicitation as long as:
(i) Such technical assistance, consulting or other services, or
participation in legislative committee meetings does not result
in bid specifications to be drawn such that only the vendor or re-
lated party, or affiliate or subsidiary of the vendor, can meet the
bid specifications;
(ii) Such technical assistance, consulting or other services,
or participation in legislative committee meetings does not oth-
erwise provide the vendor or related party, or affiliate or sub-
sidiary of the vendor, with a quantifiable and objective advantage
in the bid process; and
(iii) Any work product or written documentation produced as a re-
sult of the technical assistance, consulting or other services, or
participation in legislative committee meetings is accessible to
a public records request if the vendor responds to a relevant so-
licitation as provided in section 67-9208, Idaho Code.
(9) No person who has served in elected public office within three hun-
dred sixty-five (365) days of a bid submission deadline shall participate
in the solicitation, bid, or contract process pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter on behalf of a vendor.
(10) No vendor shall employ an individual who has served in public of-
fice, or worked in a state agency or institution, within three hundred sixty-
five (365) days of winning a bid where such individual participated in the
solicitation, bid, or contract process pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
SECTION 11. That Section 67-9232, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9232. CHALLENGES AND APPEALS. (1) Bid specifications.
(a) There shall be, beginning with the date of receipt of notice, a
period of no more than ten (10) working days in which any vendor, quali-
fied and able to sell or supply the items to be acquired, may notify the
administrator in writing of his intention to challenge the specifica-
tions and shall specifically state the exact nature of his challenge.
The specific challenge shall describe the location of the challenged
portion or clause in the specification document, unless the challenge
concerns an omission, explain why any provision should be struck, added
or altered, and contain suggested corrections.
(b) Upon receipt of the challenge, the administrator shall either deny
the challenge, and such denial shall be considered the final agency de-
cision, or he shall present the matter to the director for appointment
of a determinations officer. If the director appoints a determinations
officer, then all vendors, who are invited to bid on the property sought
to be acquired, shall be notified of the appeal and the appointment of


a determinations officer and may indicate in writing their agreement or
disagreement with the challenge within five (5) days. The notice to the
vendors may be electronic. Any vendor may note his agreement or dis-
agreement with the challenge. The determinations officer may, on his
own motion, refer the challenge portion and any related portions of the
challenge to the author of the specification to be rewritten with the
advice and comments of the vendors capable of supplying the property,
rewrite the specification himself and/or reject all or any part of any
challenge. If specifications are to be rewritten, the matter shall be
continued until the determinations officer makes a final determination
of the acceptability of the revised specifications.
(c) The administrator shall reset the bid opening no later than fif-
teen (15) days after final determination of challenges or the amendment
of the specifications. If the administrator denies the challenge, then
the bid opening date shall not be reset.
(d) The final decision of the determinations officer or administrator
on the challenge to specifications shall not be considered a contested
case within the meaning of the administrative procedure act; provided
that a vendor disagreeing with specifications may include such dis-
agreement as a reason for asking for appointment of a determinations
officer pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Nonresponsive bids.
(a) There shall be, beginning with the day following receipt of notice
of rejection, a period of five (5) working days in which a bidder whose
bid was found nonresponsive may appeal such decision to the director
of the department of administration. A nonresponsive bid, within the
meaning of this chapter, is a bid that does not comply with the bid invi-
tation and specifications and shall not apply to a vendor whose bid is
considered but who is determined not to be the lowest responsible bidder
as defined in this chapter. The director shall:
(i) Deny the application; or
(ii) Appoint a determinations officer to review the record and
submit a recommended order to the director to affirm or reverse the
administrator's decision of bid nonresponsiveness.
(b) The director shall, upon receipt of a written recommendation from
the determinations officer, sustain, modify or reverse the administra-
tor's nonresponsive bid decision. An appeal conducted under the pro-
visions of this subsection shall not be considered a contested case and
shall not be subject to judicial review under the provisions of chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) Lowest responsible bidder.
(a) A vendor whose bid is considered may, within five (5) working days
following receipt of notice that he is not the lowest responsible bid-
der, apply to the director for appointment of a determinations officer.
The application shall set forth in specific terms the reasons why the
administrator's decision is thought to be erroneous. Upon receipt of
the application, the director shall within five (5) working days:
(i) Deny the application, and such denial shall be considered the
final agency decision;


(ii) Appoint a determinations officer to review the record to de-
termine whether the administrator's selection of the lowest re-
sponsible bidder is correct; or
(iii) Appoint a determinations officer with authority to conduct a
contested case hearing in accordance with the provisions of chap-
ter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(b) The period for filing an application pursuant to paragraph (a) of
this subsection shall be suspended upon a request by a bidder for pub-
lic records related to the solicitation pursuant to chapter 1, title 74,
Idaho Code. The period for filing an application shall resume upon the
public agency's written confirmation it has produced the public records
requested or written denial of the request pursuant to section 74-103,
Idaho Code.
(c) A determinations officer appointed pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii)
of this subsection shall inform the director by written recommendation
whether, in his opinion, the administrator's selection of the lowest
responsible bidder is correct. The determinations officer in making
this recommendation may rely on the documents of record, statements
of employees of the state of Idaho participating in any phase of the
selection process, and statements of any vendor submitting a bid. A
contested case hearing shall not be allowed and the determinations
officer shall not be required to solicit statements from any person.
Upon receipt of the recommendation from the determinations officer,
the director shall sustain, modify or reverse the decision of the ad-
ministrator on the selection of the lowest responsible bidder, or the
director may appoint a determinations officer pursuant to paragraph
(a)(iii) of this subsection.
(d)(i) Any final decision rendered by the director that denied
an application pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection or
that sustained the decision of the administrator under paragraph
(c) of this subsection shall be subject to judicial review. A pe-
tition for judicial review pursuant to this subsection shall be
filed within twenty-eight (28) days of any final decision rendered
by the director. The director shall as soon as possible transmit
to the reviewing court the original record or a certified copy of
the record that shall consist of all information received or re-
lied on by the administrator in making the lowest responsible bid-
der determination, all information submitted to the director or
the determinations officer, and any other information allowed by
the court. The court shall affirm the decision rendered by the di-
rector unless the court finds that the administrator's determina-
tion of the lowest responsible bidder or the director's findings,
inferences, conclusions, or decisions rendered are:
1. In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;
2. In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;
3. Made on unlawful procedure;
4. Not supported by substantial evidence on the record as a
whole; or
5. Arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion.


(ii) In judicial review proceedings pursuant to the provisions
of this paragraph, the time for filing of briefs and for hearings
shall be set by the court at the earliest possible time, or in no
event beyond twenty-eight (28) calendar days from the date of fil-
ing of the petition.
(iii) If the court does not affirm the decision rendered by the di-
rector, the proposed award of the contract or the award of the con-
tract shall be deemed in violation of this chapter.
(e) A determinations officer appointed pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii)
of this subsection shall conduct a contested case hearing and upon con-
clusion of the hearing shall prepare findings of fact, conclusions of
law and a recommended order for the director of the department of admin-
istration. Upon receipt of the findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommended order, the director shall enter a final order sustaining,
modifying or reversing the decision of the administrator on the selec-
tion of the lowest responsible bidder.
(4) Sole source procurement.
(a) In the case of a sole source procurement, there shall be a period of
not more than five (5) working days from the last date of public notice
in which any vendor, able to sell or supply the property to be acquired,
may notify the administrator, in writing, of his intention to challenge
the sole source procurement and briefly explain the nature of the chal-
lenge.
(b) Upon receipt of the challenge, the director shall either:
(i) Deny the application; or
(ii) Appoint a determinations officer to review the record and
submit a recommended order to the director to affirm or reverse the
administrator's sole source determination.
(c) The director shall, upon receipt of a written recommendation from
the determinations officer, sustain, modify or reverse the administra-
tor's sole source determination. An appeal conducted under the provi-
sions of this subsection shall not be considered a contested case and
shall not be subject to judicial review under the provisions of chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(5) The administrator may, on his own initiative, file a complaint with
the director for a hearing before a determinations officer. The director
shall appoint a determinations officer who shall make written recommenda-
tions to the director and the director shall render whatever decision is nec-
essary to resolve the complaint.
(6) The director is hereby authorized and directed to appoint a deter-
minations officer whenever one is required by this chapter. The officer
shall meet and render whatever determination is called for. When a complaint
is filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, no bid may be awarded
until the final decision is rendered by the director; provided that in all
other cases where a determinations officer is appointed by the director, the
director shall have the power to allow the acquisition contract to be awarded
to the successful bidder prior to or after the decision of the determinations
officer if he determines such award to be in the best interests of the state.
Any determinations officer appointed pursuant to this section shall exist
only for the duration of unresolved complaints on an acquisition and shall


be dismissed upon resolution of all such complaints. The determinations
officer shall be guided in his determination by the best economic interests
of the state for both the near future and more extended periods of time. In
addition to the powers conferred on the determinations officer, the director
may:
(a) Impose the penalty prescribed by section 67-9231(3), Idaho Code;
(b) Enjoin any activity that violates this chapter;
(c) Direct that bids be rejected or sustained;
(d) Direct that specifications be rejected, sustained or modified; and
(e) Direct further legal action.
(7) Challenges or appeals conducted pursuant to subsection (1), (2),
(3)(a)(i), or (3)(a)(ii) of this section shall not be considered to be a con-
tested case as that term is defined in the administrative procedure act. An
appeal conducted pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(iii) of this section shall be
conducted as a contested case according to the provisions of chapter 52, ti-
tle 67, Idaho Code.
(8) Any person or vendor filing a formal written protest of his inten-
tion to challenge bid specifications pursuant to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, or an appeal pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, shall post
with the administrator at the time of filing a protest bond in the form of a
certified check, cashier's check, bid bond, or surety bond.
(a) For contract bids with an estimated total value of less than ten
million dollars ($10,000,000) over the initial term, the protest bond
amount shall be equal to one percent (1%).
(b) For contract bids with an estimated total value of ten million
dollars ($10,000,000) or more over the initial term, the protest bond
amount shall be equal to one-half percent (0.5%) and capped at ten mil-
lion dollars ($10,000,000).
(c) The agency shall provide the estimated contract value to any
prospective protester within twenty-four (24) hours of a written re-
quest.
(d) Failure to post the protest bond at the time of filing the formal
written protest shall result in the immediate summary dismissal of the
protest by the administrator.
(e) If the protest or appeal is successful, the protest bond shall be
returned to the protester in full. If the protest or appeal is denied,
and the final agency decision issued by the administrator or direc-
tor finds the protest to be a frivolous protest as defined in section
67-9203, Idaho Code, the state shall retain the protest bond in its en-
tirety as liquidated damages for the delay and administrative costs of
the procurement. Such findings shall constitute a determined frivolous
protest for the purposes of debarment under section 67-9217, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 12. That Section 67-9233, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9233. ETHICS IN PROCUREMENT. (1) It is the intent of the legisla-
ture that all persons involved in the process of procuring property for the
state conduct themselves in a manner that protects the public interest and


fosters confidence in the integrity of the process. To that end, this sec-
tion shall apply to all such persons, including:
(a) State officers, even if the officer or officer's employer is ex-
cluded from the definition of "agency" under section 67-9203, Idaho
Code;
(b) State employees, even if the employee works for an officer, insti-
tution or entity that is excluded from the definition of "agency" under
section 67-9203, Idaho Code; and
(c) Vendors or any person acting on behalf of a vendor.
(2) In any matter relating to state procurement, it is an unethical
breach of the public trust to:
(a) Knowingly attempt to realize personal gain through state office or
employment by any conduct inconsistent with this chapter or any other
applicable law or rule;
(b) Attempt to influence a state officer or employee to violate the pol-
icy or provisions of this chapter or any other applicable law or rule; or
(c) Knowingly violate an applicable law or rule.
(3) Subject to due process requirements, and in addition to any other
administrative, civil or criminal sanctions provided by law or rule, a state
employee's supervisor may impose the following sanctions on the employee for
an unethical breach of the public trust:
(a) A reprimand or warning, either oral or written;
(b) Suspension with or without pay for a specified period of time; or
(c) Termination of employment.
(4) In addition to any other administrative, civil or criminal sanction
provided by law or rule, a vendor who commits an unethical breach of the pub-
lic trust, or whose advocate or representative commits an unethical breach
of the public trust, may be disqualified pursuant to section 67-9217, Idaho
Code.
(5) Vendors, employees of a vendor, or any persons acting on behalf of
a vendor shall report to the secretary of state any financial expenditures
over fifty dollars ($50.00), including but not limited to reimbursements for
meals and travel.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.